Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Teacher Contracts

§ 21-7-101.
Short title.

This article shall be known and cited as the Wyoming Teacher Employment Law.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.1; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 151; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-151.

Principal of a school was not granted tenure by this article

and the school district was not prevented from refusing to renew his contract as a principal. Spurlock v. Board of Trustees, 699 P.2d 270,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Barger v. Board of Trustees, 494 P.2d 544,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1972); O'Melia v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 497 P.2d 540,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1972); Shenefield v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 544 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of school authorities for hiring or retaining incompetent or otherwise unsuitable teacher, 60 ALR4th 260.

§ 21-7-102.
Definitions.

As used in this article the following definitions shall apply:

“Board”. — The board of trustees of any school district in the state of Wyoming offering instruction in any of the grades kindergarten through twelve (12);

“Continuing Contract Teacher” means:

Any initial contract teacher who has been employed by the same school district in the state of Wyoming for a period of three (3) consecutive school years and has had his contract renewed for a fourth consecutive school year; or

A teacher who has achieved continuing contract status in one (1) district, and who without lapse of time has taught two (2) consecutive school years and has had his contract renewed for a third consecutive school year by the employing school district.

“Dismissal”. — The cancellation of any teacher’s contract of employment by the board of trustees while such contract is in effect. In the case of a continuing contract teacher, dismissal shall mean cancellation of his contract at any time other than at the end of a school year where proper notice has been given;

“Initial Contract Teacher”. — Any teacher who has not achieved continuing contract status;

“Superintendent”. — The chief administrative officer of any school district;

“Suspension” means the removal of a teacher from the classroom during the school year. Unless otherwise agreed to by the teacher and the district superintendent or board, suspension shall be with, or without, pay as follows:

By the superintendent “with pay” pending:

The investigation of an allegation of misconduct which investigation shall not exceed thirty (30) days; and

The final action of the board following completion of the investigation under subdivision (I) of this subparagraph and, if requested, the outcome of a hearing in accordance with W.S.

21-7-110

.

By the board “without pay” for a period not to exceed one (1) calendar year following the outcome of a hearing in accordance with W.S.

21-7-110

.

“Teacher”. — Any person employed under contract by the board of trustees of a school district as a certified professional employee;

“Termination”. — The failure of the board of trustees of a school district in Wyoming to reemploy a teacher at the end of a school year in any given year;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 182, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.3; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 152; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-152; Laws 1973, ch. 84, § 1; 1998, ch. 22, § 1; 2011, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 101, § 1; 2013 ch. 167, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 179, § 2, effective March 9, 2015; 2019 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “this” for “the”; in (a)(ii)(A) and (a)(ii)(B), added “has performed satisfactorily on performance evaluations implemented by the district under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) during this period of time” or variant; rewrote (a)(vi), modifying the definition of suspension with or without pay; and repealed former (a)(ix), which read: “ ‘Suspension without pay’ means the removal of a teacher from the classroom during the school year with the termination of salary for a period not to exceed one (1) calendar year commencing upon completion of a hearing held under W.S.

21-7-110

.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(ii)(A), deleted “has performed satisfactorily on performance evaluations implemented by the district under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) during this period of time and” following “three (3) consecutive school years” and added “and, beginning school year 2013-2014 and each school year thereafter, has performed satisfactorily on performance evaluations implemented by the district under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) during this period of time”; and inserted “beginning school year 2013-2014 and each school year thereafter” in (a)(ii)(B).

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “2016-2017” for “2013-2014” in (a)(ii)(A) and (B).

Laws 2013, ch. 167, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(ii)(A) and (B) substituted “2019-2020” for “2016-2017.”

Laws 2015, ch. 179, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ii), added "means," in (a)(ii)(A), deleted "and, beginning school year 2019-2020 and each school year thereafter, has performed satisfactorily on performance evaluations implemented by the district under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) during this period of time," in (a)(ii)(B), deleted "and, beginning school year 2019-2020 and each school year thereafter, has performed satisfactorily on performance evaluations conducted by both districts under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) during this period of time," and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

This article gives tenure to a continuing contract teacher.

Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971).

Reference in subsection (a)(ii) to normally conceived function of teaching, as opposed to supervising,

is unmistakable. Seyfang v. Board of Trustees, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Tenure of tenured teacher not lost when he becomes principal. —

A school employee who became tenured as a teacher pursuant to this article did not lose his tenure when he became a principal. Accordingly, he had to be afforded procedural and evidentiary standards incidental to a tenured classroom teacher position before he could be discharged from his position as a classroom teacher. Spurlock v. Board of Trustees, 699 P.2d 270,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1985).

Common meaning of “teacher” is present in subsection (a)(vii).

Seyfang v. Board of Trustees, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Borman v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 627 P.2d 1364,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1981).

Initial contract teacher has no right to reasons or hearing before termination. —

An initial contract teacher has no statutory right to either a statement of reasons or to a hearing before the decision not to rehire him for another year. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 406 F. Supp. 781, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17079 (D. Wyo. 1976), aff'd, 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

And thus has no property interest as contract principal. —

An initial contract teacher does not have a claim, entitlement or reasonable expectation of reemployment and therefore has no property interest under state law or otherwise as an initial contract principal. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 406 F. Supp. 781, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17079 (D. Wyo. 1976), aff'd, 558 F.2d 982,

1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1977); Roberts v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist., 676 P.2d 577,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1984).

Initial contract teacher must prove termination resulted from exercise of free speech. —

While a nontenured teacher or a principal may not be terminated from employment for exercising constitutional rights of free speech, such person has the burden of proving that it was the exercise of such rights rather than other causes which resulted in his termination. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 406 F. Supp. 781, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17079 (D. Wyo. 1976), aff'd, 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

School superintendent does not fall within definition of “teacher,”

set forth in subsection (a)(vii). Seyfang v. Board of Trustees, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Thus, superintendent not entitled to tenure under Teacher Employment Law. —

A superintendent of a school district is not entitled to tenure under the Wyoming Teacher Employment Law and, therefore, is not a person aggrieved by the board's decision thereunder to terminate his employment. Seyfang v. Board of Trustees, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Guidance counselor not a teacher. —

In a certificated guidance counselor's wrongful termination suit, summary judgment in favor of the school district was proper as the counselor was not a teacher within the meaning of the Wyoming Teacher Employment Law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

21-1-101

to 21-1-114, and was therefore not entitled to its protections.
Luhm v. Bd. of Trs., 2009 WY 63, 206 P.3d 1290,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Quoted

in

Bertot v. School Dist., 522 F.2d 1171,

1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 13689

(10th Cir. 1975); McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981); Leonard v. Converse County Sch. Dist. No. 2, 788 P.2d 1119,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1990); Forbis v. Fremont County Sch. Dist. No. 38, 842 P.2d 1063,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976); Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 558 F.2d 982,

1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285

(10th Cir. 1977); Laramie Cnty. Sch. Dist. No. One ex rel. Bd. of Trs. v. Kinstler, 2015 WY 143,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Nov. 12, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Residency Restrictions Upon Teachers' Right of Travel. O'Melia v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 497 P.2d 540,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 329 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “teacher” for purposes of tenure statute, 94 ALR3d 141.

§ 21-7-103.
Absences and leaves not considered interruptions in service.

Absences and leaves of absence approved by the employing board shall not be considered as interruptions in service for purposes of determining continuing contract status.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 153; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-153.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Services included in computing period of service for purpose of teachers' seniority, salary, tenure, or retirement benefits, 56 ALR5th 493.

§ 21-7-104.
Employment of continuing contract teachers on continuing basis; salary increases.

A continuing contract teacher shall be employed by each school district on a continuing basis from year to year without annual contract renewal at a salary determined by the board of trustees of each district, said salary subject to increases from time to time as provided for in the salary provisions adopted by the board.

Any teacher hired by a Wyoming school district shall receive credit in accordance with that district’s salary schedule for all prior years of service obtained as a teacher in any Wyoming school district or as a teacher in the regional developmental preschool system defined by W.S. 21-2-701(a)(iii).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21.272.4; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 154; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-154; Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 506; 2001, ch. 123, § 1; 2011, ch. 182, § 1; 2019 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), added “Subject to satisfactory performance evaluation under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xviii).”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), deleted “Subject to satisfactory performance evaluation under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xviii).”

The very purpose of tenure and continuing contract laws

is to give recognition to a constitutionally protectible interest. This type of statute gives teachers a certain degree of security in their positions and guarantees freedom to teach by protecting them from removal on unfounded charges. O'Melia v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 497 P.2d 540,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1972); Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976); Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

Continuing contract teacher has reasonable expectation of continued employment. —

Absent good cause to the contrary a continuing contract teacher has a reasonable expectation of continued employment. O'Melia v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 497 P.2d 540,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1972); Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

When discharge of continuing contract teacher lawful. —

A discharge of a continuing contract teacher is lawful only if substantial evidence shows the existence of good cause, and the teacher is given a hearing by an impartial board as required by the Administrative Procedure Act. Simineo v. School Dist., 594 F.2d 1353, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 16044 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Variance from negotiated salary schedule. —

Although school district administrators may not have had specific authority from school board to grant teachers pay increases which varied from established salary schedule, board could not avoid performance where it approved, honored, and renewed teachers' contracts; inconsistency with district regulations, by itself, did not render contracts invalid. Lippincott v. Board of Trustees, 3 P.3d 861,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Bertot v. School Dist., 522 F.2d 1171, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 13689 (10th Cir. 1975).

Quoted

in

Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971); McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

Roberts v. Lincoln County School Dist. Number One, 676 P.2d 577,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Abell v. Dewey, 870 P.2d 363,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Residency Restrictions Upon Teachers' Right of Travel. O'Melia v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 497 P.2d 540,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 329 (1973).

For Article, “Teacher Tenure Reform in Wyoming: Bad Teachers Left Behind”, see15 Wyo. L. Rev. 45 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “teacher” for purposes of tenure statute, 94 ALR3d 141.

§ 21-7-105.
Employment of initial contract teachers on annual basis; notice of termination to such teachers.

An initial contract teacher who has taught in the system continuously for a period of at least ninety (90) days shall be hired on an annual basis and shall be notified in writing of the reasons for termination, if such is the case, no later than April 15 of each year. An initial contract teacher’s employment may be terminated for any reason not specifically prohibited by law, and a board is not limited to the reasons set forth in W.S. 21-7-110(a). The notice of termination shall not be disseminated to the public or to prospective employers absent the teacher’s consent. Nothing contained in this section shall limit the use of the notice in any hearing.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 155; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-155; Laws 1987, ch. 141, § 1; 1993, ch. 219, § 1.

Purpose of statutory notice of termination

prior to March 15 of the school year is to give the teacher time to seek employment elsewhere in the next school year. Borman v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 627 P.2d 1364,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1981).

No statutory provision supports the contention that an initial contract teacher has an expectation of reemployment.

O'Melia v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 497 P.2d 540,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1972); Borman v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 627 P.2d 1364,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1981).

Nor does he have formal contractual provision for reemployment. —

Initial contract teachers work under no statutory or formal contractual provision indicating any expectation of reemployment. Bertot v. School Dist., 522 F.2d 1171, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 13689 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Evaluation policy, rules, inapplicable to untenured teachers. —

A school district's evaluation policy and rules, which were adopted primarily for use in performing operational and supervisory duties, did not protect initial contract teachers from dismissal because, as teachers without tenure, they could be dismissed even after receiving favorable evaluations. Leonard v. Converse County Sch. Dist. No. 2, 788 P.2d 1119,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1990).

As is implied covenant, public policy. —

The implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing and the public policy exception to the employment-at-will doctrine do not apply to the termination of employment contracts between school districts and initial contract teachers. Leonard v. Converse County Sch. Dist. No. 2, 788 P.2d 1119,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1990).

He has no right to reasons or hearing before termination. —

An initial contract teacher has no statutory right to either a statement of reasons or to a hearing before the decision not to rehire him for another year. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 406 F. Supp. 781, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17079 (D. Wyo. 1976), aff'd, 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Unless he can show deprivation of liberty or property. —

The United States constitution does not require a hearing before nonrenewal of a nontenured teacher's contract, unless he can show that he was deprived of an interest in “liberty” or that he had a “property” interest in continued employment, despite the lack of tenure. Bertot v. School Dist., 522 F.2d 1171, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 13689 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

But he has no property interest under state law. —

An initial contract teacher does not have a claim, entitlement or reasonable expectation of reemployment and therefore has no property interest under state law or otherwise as an initial contract principal. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 406 F. Supp. 781, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17079 (D. Wyo. 1976), aff'd, 558 F.2d 982,

1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1977); Roberts v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist., 676 P.2d 577,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1984).

And has burden of proving termination resulted from exercise of free speech. —

While a nontenured teacher or a principal may not be terminated from employment for exercising constitutional rights of free speech, such person has the burden of proving that it was the exercise of such rights rather than other causes which resulted in his termination. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 406 F. Supp. 781, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17079 (D. Wyo. 1976), aff'd, 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Contract teacher not given constitutionally protected property right by regulations establishing evaluative policies. —

Regulations establishing evaluative policies primarily to benefit the school district in performing its operational and supervisory duties do not give initial contract teachers a constitutionally protected property right in the renewal of the teacher's contract. Roberts v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist., 676 P.2d 577,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1984).

Notice of termination may be included in contract. —

Specific notice of the year-end termination, sufficient for this section, may be provided in a one-year contract of employment. Borman v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 627 P.2d 1364,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1981).

Insufficient showing of property interest in reemployment in initial contract teachers for jury issue. —

See Bertot v. School Dist., 522 F.2d 1171, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 13689 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Quoted

in

McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of notice of intention to discharge or not to rehire teacher, under statutes requiring such notice, 52 ALR4th 301.

Right to unemployment compensation or social security benefits of teacher or other school employee, 33 ALR5th 643.

§ 21-7-106.
Notice of recommendation of termination to teacher; when termination effective.

A continuing contract teacher shall be notified of a recommendation of termination by the superintendent or any member of the board designated by the superintendent or designated by the board pursuant to a majority vote of the board by giving the teacher written notice together with written reasons for termination on or before April 15 of any year. Upon receipt of notice, the teacher may request a hearing on the recommendation before an independent hearing officer through the office of administrative hearings as provided under W.S.

21-7-110

.

If ordered by the board under W.S. 21-7-110(g), termination under recommendation shall be effective at the end of the school year in the year in which notice of termination is given.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.5; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 156; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-156; Laws 1987, ch. 141, § 1; 1993, ch. 219, § 1; 2011, ch. 182, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), added “through the office of administrative hearings.”

Editor’s notes. —

The following case notes that relate to a hearing on recommendation of termination are from cases decided under former §

21-7-108

.

Construction. —

Phrase “notice
of termination” refers to the notice of recommendation of termination,
not to some final document issued by a board of trustees after reviewing
a hearing officer's suggested disposition of the case. Therefore,
a teacher was not entitled to compensation following the end of the
2011-12 school year after he was not reemployed because the term “notice
of termination” did not mean something other than notice of
recommendation of termination; the terms were used interchangeable
to designate a single document. Laramie Cnty. Sch. Dist. No. One ex rel. Bd. of Trs. v. Kinstler, 2015 WY 143, 361 P.3d 819,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2015).

Failure to grant motion for more definite statement held error. —

Where a school board charged a teacher with having a conflicting philosophy on teaching methods and procedures and an inability to work harmoniously with the administration and the board, notice given the teacher was inadequate, and the school board's failure to grant his timely motion for a more definite statement constituted an abuse of discretion amounting to error. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Hearing requirement is for continuing contract teachers only. —

The only requirement of a hearing on a recommendation of termination is for continuing contract teachers, not initial contract teachers. Bertot v. School Dist., 522 F.2d 1171, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 13689 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Procedure for termination is not spelled out. —

Section

21-7-110

sets out specific provisions, in a dismissal case, as to procedure. There is no comparable procedure statute for a termination case. Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971) (but see Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983), annotated below).

Board cannot terminate at will. —

Although the legislature did not spell out any grounds for termination, this does not mean that there need not be grounds or cause for termination, and that the board can terminate at will without regard to grounds. Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971).

Applicability of §

21-7-110

. —

Section

21-7-110

applies to termination as well as dismissal and suspension cases. Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Initial board decision based on superintendent's investigation. —

Neither constitutional due process nor statutory requirements of an impartial hearing mandate the disqualification of the entire board as a result of the board's having considered the results of the superintendent's investigation and reached an initial decision, since mere familiarity with the facts of a case gained by an agency in the performance of its statutory role does not disqualify a decision maker and, based upon the additional information afforded by the adversary-type hearing, the board is free to reverse or affirm its earlier decision. Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

The contract teacher may not be deprived of employment contract renewal without cause.

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Which must be shown by substantial evidence before board. —

A hearing on termination of a continuing contract teacher involves the question of whether there is good cause for termination. There must not only be good cause but there must be substantial evidence before the board to show that there is good cause. Absent either, a decision on the part of the board to terminate will be arbitrary. Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971); Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

Cause may not be found in a constitutionally protected reason.

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Even if teacher is nontenured. —

Even nontenured teachers cannot be dismissed for exercising constitutional rights. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

A teacher has the right to criticize his or her employers.

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

And utterances of teacher in behalf of his union activities are protected

by the United States and Wyoming constitutions. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Where there was no proof that the statements made by a teacher in pursuit of his union activities were made “with knowledge of their falsity or with reckless disregard for their truth or falsity” and there was no proof that his published statements have impeded the performance of his teaching duties or in any way disrupted the functions of the school, the criticized publications furnished no cause or grounds for failure to renew the teacher's employment contract. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Nonrenewal based partly on protected activity. —

Nonrenewal of a teacher's contract based in part on a protected activity and in part upon an unprotected activity is not a proper decision. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

It is not imperative that a teacher prove that the sole reason for his failure to have his contract renewed was his participation in constitutionally protected activities. If his penalty was imposed by the board for “even partially” being “in retaliation” for his exercise of a protected right such as freedom of speech, he is entitled to relief. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Inquiry into bias of board members necessary for fair hearing. —

It was a denial of a teacher's right to a fair and impartial hearing for him to have been denied inquiry as on voir dire of the board to ascertain the absence or presence of bias or prejudice of the members. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Voir dire inquiry established individual board members' fairness and impartiality. —

See Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Participation of board's attorney held to deny fair hearing. —

Where a school board designated its attorney to act as presiding officer at the hearing of a continuing contract teacher's termination case, and where the school board's attorney drew up and executed the statement of reasons for termination; acted as prosecutor; acted as the hearing officer; ruled on objections; argued with opposing counsel on opposing counsel's objections; interrogated witnesses; made objections and then made rulings on his own objections; sat with the board when they made their final decision; made public statements to the patrons in the audience as to the reasons why it was necessary to have the hearing at all; and cross-examined witnesses in behalf of the school board, the teacher was not afforded a fair and impartial hearing. Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971).

Evidence insufficient to support conclusions of cause to terminate teacher's contract. —

See Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Termination of facilitator's contract. —

Ability to lead staff and communicate effectively with staff and other educators were essential attributes for performance of educational resource center facilitator position, so that demonstrated absence of these abilities was good cause for termination of facilitator's contract. Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Position description furnished to facilitator, which emphasized that the facilitator was expected to impart his knowledge and provide direction to those with whom he works in a manner susceptible of being understood, provided a sufficiently clear standard of conduct. Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981); Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

Barger v. Board of Trustees, 494 P.2d 544,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1972).

Cited

in

Kahrs v. Board of Trustees for Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 901 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1995); Lippincott v. Board of Trustees,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 98

, 3 P.3d 861 (Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For comment on Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976), see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of request for hearing under statute requiring hearing on request before discharge, 89 ALR2d 1018.

Sufficiency of notice of intention to discharge or not to rehire teacher, under statutes requiring such notice, 52 ALR4th 301.

§ 21-7-107.
Resignation of teachers.

Any teacher may resign his position, effective at the end of the school year, by giving written notice on or before May 15 of any year, to the superintendent of schools or any other designated official, of his desire not to be employed by the school district for the following year.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.6; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 157; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-157; Laws 1987, ch. 141, § 1.

Quoted

in

McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Lippincott v. Board of Trustees,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 98

, 3 P.3d 861 (Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Termination of teacher's tenure status by resignation, 9 ALR4th 729.

§ 21-7-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 219, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 7, related to a hearing on recommendation of termination. For present provisions relating to a hearing upon a recommendation of termination, see §

21-7-106

(a).

§ 21-7-109.
When contract offered to and accepted by initial contract teacher.

The board must offer a contract for the ensuing year to each initial contract teacher if such is to be offered by April 15, and it must be accepted by May 15 of each year or the position will be declared open.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.8; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 159; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-159; Laws 1987, ch. 141, § 1.

Where termination of initial contract resulted by operation of law

under this section the school board's abstaining votes on a motion to award a contract thereafter were of no consequence with respect to the teacher's previously terminated employment status. Forbis v. Fremont County Sch. Dist., 842 P.2d 1063,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1992).